Wisconsin, session 2025, SB750.
do enact as follows:SB750,11Section 1. 38.22 (5) of the statutes is renumbered 38.22 (5) (a) and amended 2to read:SB750,2,6338.22 (5) (a) The Subject to par. (b), the board shall promulgate rules 4establishing the priority to be given by a district board in admitting students who 5are residents of the district, students who are not residents of the district but are 6residents of this state, and students who are not residents of this state.SB750,27Section 2. 38.22 (5) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB750,2,13838.22 (5) (b) 1. Notwithstanding the board’s rules under par. (a), and subject 9to approval by the board, a district board may adopt a policy to reserve program 10spaces to accommodate admission of students in special circumstances. Factors 11that may be considered for special circumstance admission include hardship, 12school-to-work program participation, special need, school partnerships with 13employers, and enrollment diversity.SB750,2,18142. Notwithstanding the board’s rules under par. (a), a district board may 15adopt a policy to reserve program spaces to accommodate admission of students in 16protective services programs, including programs that prepare students to provide 17law enforcement, paramedic, emergency medical technician, or firefighting 18services.SB750,2,1919